Mississippi, session 20261E, SB2002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-21-261, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted and amended as follows: 43-21-261.  (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, records involving children shall not be disclosed, other than to necessary staff or officials of the youth court, a guardian ad litem appointed to a child by the court, or a Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) volunteer who may be assigned in a dependency, abuse or neglect case, except pursuant to an order of the youth court specifying the person or persons to whom the records may be disclosed, the extent of the records which may be disclosed and the purpose of the disclosure.  Such court orders for disclosure shall be limited to those instances in which the youth court concludes, in its discretion, that disclosure is required for the best interests of the child, the public safety, the functioning of the youth court, or to identify a person who knowingly made a false allegation of child abuse or neglect, and then only to the following persons: (a)  The judge of another youth court or member of another youth court staff; (b)  The court of the parties in a child custody or adoption cause in another court; (c)  A judge of any other court or members of another court staff, including the chancery court that ordered a forensic interview; (d)  Representatives of a public or private agency providing supervision or having custody of the child under order of the youth court; (e)  Any person engaged in a bona fide research purpose, provided that no information identifying the subject of the records shall be made available to the researcher unless it is absolutely essential to the research purpose and the judge gives prior written approval, and the child, through his or her representative, gives permission to release the information; (f)  The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, or its duly authorized representatives, for the purpose of a child's enrollment into the Job Corps Training Program as authorized by Title IV of the Comprehensive Employment Training Act of 1973 (29 USCS Section 923 et seq.).  However, no records, reports, investigations or information derived therefrom pertaining to child abuse or neglect shall be disclosed; (g)  Any person pursuant to a finding by a judge of the youth court of compelling circumstances affecting the health, safety or well-being of a child and that such disclosure is in the best interests of the child or an adult who was formerly the subject of a youth court delinquency proceeding; (h)  A person who was the subject of a knowingly made false allegation of child abuse or neglect which has resulted in a conviction of a perpetrator in accordance with Section 97-35-47 or which allegation was referred by the Department of Child Protection Services to a prosecutor or law enforcement official in accordance with the provisions of Section 43-21-353(4). Law enforcement agencies may disclose information to the public concerning the taking of a child into custody for the commission of a delinquent act without the necessity of an order from the youth court.  The information released shall not identify the child or his address unless the information involves a child convicted as an adult. (2)  Any records involving children which are disclosed under an order of the youth court or pursuant to the terms of this section and the contents thereof shall be kept confidential by the person or agency to whom the record is disclosed unless otherwise provided in the order.  Any further disclosure of any records involving children shall be made only under an order of the youth court as provided in this section. (3)  Upon request, the parent, guardian or custodian of the child who is the subject of a youth court cause or any attorney for such parent, guardian or custodian, shall have the right to inspect any record, report or investigation relevant to a matter to be heard by a youth court, except that the identity of the reporter shall not be released, nor the name of any other person where the person or agency making the information available finds that disclosure of the information would be likely to endanger the life or safety of such person.  The attorney for the parent, guardian or custodian of the child, upon request, shall be provided a copy of any record, report or investigation relevant to a matter to be heard by a youth court, but the identity of the reporter must be redacted and the name of any other person must also be redacted if the person or agency making the information available finds that disclosure of the information would be likely to endanger the life, safety or well-being of the person.  A record provided to the attorney under this section must remain in the attorney's control and the attorney may not provide copies or access to another person or entity without prior consent of a court with appropriate jurisdiction. (4)  Upon request, the child who is the subject of a youth court cause shall have the right to have his counsel inspect and copy any record, report or investigation which is filed with the youth court or which is to be considered by the youth court at a hearing. (5)  (a)  The youth court prosecutor or prosecutors, the county attorney, the district attorney, the youth court defender or defenders, or any attorney representing a child shall have the right to inspect and copy any law enforcement record involving children. (b)  The Department of Child Protection Services shall disclose to a county prosecuting attorney or district attorney any and all records resulting from an investigation into suspected child abuse or neglect when the case has been referred by the Department of Child Protection Services to the county prosecuting attorney or district attorney for criminal prosecution. (c)  Agency records made confidential under the provisions of this section may be disclosed to a court of competent jurisdiction. (d)  Records involving children shall be disclosed to the Division of Victim Compensation of the Office of the Attorney General upon the division's request without order of the youth court for purposes of determination of eligibility for victim compensation benefits. (6)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed by the Department of Child Protection Services without order of the youth court to any attorney, physician, dentist, intern, resident, nurse, psychologist, social worker, family protection worker, family protection specialist, child caregiver, minister, law enforcement officer, or a public or private school employee making that report pursuant to Section 43-21-353(1) if the reporter has a continuing professional relationship with the child and a need for such information in order to protect or treat the child. (7)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed without further order of the youth court to any interagency child abuse task force established in any county or municipality by order of the youth court of that county or municipality. (8)  Names and addresses of juveniles twice adjudicated as delinquent for an act which would be a felony if committed by an adult or for the unlawful possession of a firearm shall not be held confidential and shall be made available to the public. (9)  Names and addresses of juveniles adjudicated as delinquent for murder, manslaughter, burglary, arson, armed robbery, aggravated assault, any sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23, for any violation of Section 41-29-139(a)(1) or for any violation of Section 63-11-30, shall not be held confidential and shall be made available to the public. (10)  The judges of the circuit and county courts, and presentence investigators for the circuit courts, as provided in Section 47-7-9, shall have the right to inspect any youth court records of a person convicted of a crime for sentencing purposes only. (11)  The victim of an offense committed by a child who is the subject of a youth court cause shall have the right to be informed of the child's disposition by the youth court. (12)  A classification hearing officer of the State Department of Corrections, as provided in Section 47-5-103, shall have the right to inspect any youth court records, excluding abuse and neglect records, of any offender in the custody of the department who as a child or minor was a juvenile offender or was the subject of a youth court cause of action, and the State Parole Board, as provided in Section 47-7-17, shall have the right to inspect such records when the offender becomes eligible for parole. (13)  The youth court shall notify the Department of Public Safety of the name, and any other identifying information such department may require, of any child who is adjudicated delinquent as a result of a violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Law. (14)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall have the right to inspect any youth court records in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice system, and to utilize tracking forms for such purpose. (15)  Upon a request by a youth court, the Administrative Office of Courts shall disclose all information at its disposal concerning any previous youth court intakes alleging that a child was a delinquent child, child in need of supervision, child in need of special care, truant child, abused child or neglected child, as well as any previous youth court adjudications for the same and all dispositional information concerning a child who at the time of such request comes under the jurisdiction of the youth court making such request. (16)  The Administrative Office of Courts may, in its discretion, disclose to the Department of Public Safety any or all of the information involving children contained in the office's youth court data management system known as Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System or "MYCIDS." (17)  The youth courts of the state shall disclose to the Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) any youth court records in order that the number of youthful offenders, abused, neglected, truant and dependent children, as well as children in need of special care and children in need of supervision, may be tracked with specificity through the youth court and adult justice system, and to utilize tracking forms for such purpose.  The disclosure prescribed in this subsection shall not require a court order and shall be made in sortable, electronic format where possible.  The PEER Committee may seek the assistance of the Administrative Office of Courts in seeking this information. The PEER Committee shall not disclose the identities of any youth who have been adjudicated in the youth courts of the state and shall only use the disclosed information for the purpose of monitoring the effectiveness and efficiency of programs established to assist adjudicated youth, and to ascertain the incidence of adjudicated youth who become adult offenders. (18)  In every case where an abuse or neglect allegation has been made, the confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply to prohibit access to a child's records by any state regulatory agency, any state or local prosecutorial agency or law enforcement agency; however, no identifying information concerning the child in question may be released to the public by such agency except as otherwise provided herein. (19)  In every case of child abuse or neglect, if a child's physical condition is medically labeled as medically "serious" or "critical" or a child dies, the confidentiality provisions of this section shall not apply.  In such cases, the following information may be released by the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services:  the cause of the circumstances regarding the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition; the age and gender of the child; information describing any previous reports of child abuse or neglect investigations that are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led to the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition; the result of any such investigations; and the services provided by and actions of the state on behalf of the child that are pertinent to the child abuse or neglect that led to the fatality or medically serious or critical physical condition. (20)  Any member of a foster care review board designated by the Department of Child Protection Services shall have the right to inspect youth court records relating to the abuse, neglect or child in need of supervision cases assigned to such member for review. (21)  Information concerning an investigation into a report of child abuse or child neglect may be disclosed without further order of the youth court in any administrative or due process hearing held, pursuant to Section 43-21-257, by the Department of Child Protection Services for individuals whose names will be placed on the central registry as substantiated perpetrators. (22)  The Department of Child Protection Services may disclose records involving children to the following: (a)  A foster home, residential child-caring agency or child-placing agency to the extent necessary to provide such care and services to a child; (b)  An individual, agency or organization that provides services to a child or the child's family in furtherance of the child's permanency plan to the extent necessary in providing those services; (c)  Health and mental health care providers of a child to the extent necessary for the provider to properly treat and care for the child; (d)  An educational institution or educational services provider where the child is enrolled or where enrollment is anticipated to the extent necessary for the school to provide appropriate services to the child; (e)  Any state agency or board that administers student financial assistance programs.  However, any records request under this paragraph shall be initiated by the agency or board for the purpose determining the child's eligibility for student financial assistance, and any disclosure shall be limited to the verification of the child's age during the period of time in which the child was in the department's legal custody; and (f)  Any other state agency if the disclosure is necessary to the department in fulfilling its statutory responsibilities in protecting the best interests of the child. (23)  Nothing in this section or chapter shall require youth court approval for disclosure of records involving children as defined in Section 43-21-105(u), if the disclosure is made in a criminal matter by a municipal or county prosecutor, a district attorney or statewide prosecutor, pursuant to the Mississippi Rules of Criminal Procedure and the records are disclosed under a protective order issued by the Circuit Court presiding over the criminal matter which incorporates the penalties stated in Section 43-21-267. (24)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2029. SECTION 2.  Section 43-21-351, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted and amended as follows: 43-21-351.  (1)  Any person or agency having knowledge that a child residing or being within the county is within the jurisdiction of the youth court may make a written report to the intake unit alleging facts sufficient to establish the jurisdiction of the youth court.  The report shall bear a permanent number that will be assigned by the court in accordance with the standards established by the Administrative Office of Courts pursuant to Section 9-21-9(d), and shall be preserved until destroyed on order of the court. (2)  There shall be in each youth court of the state an intake officer who shall be responsible for the accurate and timely entering of all intake and case information into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) for the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters, and the Department of Child Protection Services.  It shall be the responsibility of the youth court judge or referee of each county to ensure that the intake officer is carrying out the responsibility of this section. (3)  Each intake officer shall receive, at a minimum, six (6) hours of annual training on MYCIDS provided by the Mississippi Judicial College.  The required training under this subsection shall be in addition to technical training provided by the Mississippi Supreme Court MYCIDS Information Technology Department. (4)  The Mississippi Judicial College, in conjunction with the Administrative Office of Courts, shall develop training materials on MYCIDS: (a)  To ensure the accurate and timely entrance of all intake and case information throughout the state by intake officers; (b)  To ensure that youth court judges are equipped to oversee the functions of each intake officer. (5)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2029. SECTION 3.  Section 43-21-801, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted and amended as follows: 43-21-801.  (1) There is established the Youth Court Support Program.  The purpose of the program shall be to ensure that all youth courts have sufficient support funds to carry on the business of the youth court.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish a formula consistent with this section for providing state support payable from the Youth Court Support Fund for the support of the youth courts. (a)  (i)  Each regular youth court referee is eligible for youth court support funds so long as the senior chancellor does not elect to employ a youth court administrator as set forth in paragraph (b); a municipal youth court judge is also eligible.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall direct any funds to the appropriate county or municipality.  The funds shall be utilized to compensate an intake officer who shall be responsible for ensuring that all intake and case information for the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters, and the Department of Child Protection Services is entered into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) in an accurate and timely manner.  If the court already has an intake officer responsible for entering all cases of the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters, and the Department of Child Protection Services into MYCIDS, the regular youth court referee or municipal court judge may certify to the Administrative Office of Courts that such a person is already on staff.  In such a case, each regular youth court referee or municipal youth court judge shall have the sole individual discretion to appropriate those funds as expense monies to assist in hiring secretarial staff and acquiring materials and equipment incidental to carrying on the business of the court within the private practice of law of the referee or judge, or may direct the use of those funds through the county or municipal budget for court support supplies or services.  The regular youth court referee and municipal youth court judge shall be accountable for assuring through private, county or municipal employees the proper preparation and filing of all necessary tracking and other documentation attendant to the administration of the youth court. (ii)  Title to all tangible property, excepting stamps, stationery and minor expendable office supplies, procured with funds authorized by this section, shall be and forever remain in the county or municipality to be used by the judge or referee during the term of his office and thereafter by his successors. (b)  (i)  When permitted by the Administrative Office of Courts and as funds are available, the senior chancellor for Chancery Districts One, Two, Three, Four, Six, Seven, Nine, Ten, Thirteen, Fourteen, Fifteen and Eighteen may appoint a youth court administrator for the district whose responsibility will be to perform all reporting, tracking and other duties of a court administrator for all youth courts in the district that are under the chancery court system.  Any chancery district listed in this paragraph in which a chancellor appoints a referee or special master to hear any youth court matter is ineligible for funding under this paragraph (b).  The Administrative Office of Courts may allocate to an eligible chancery district a sum not to exceed Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) per year for the salary, fringe benefits and equipment of the youth court administrator, and an additional sum not to exceed One Thousand Nine Hundred Dollars ($1,900.00) for the administrator's travel expenses. (ii)  The appointment of a youth court administrator shall be evidenced by the entry of an order on the minutes of the court.  The person appointed shall serve at the will and pleasure of the senior chancellor but shall be an employee of the Administrative Office of Courts. (iii)  The Administrative Office of Courts must approve the position, job description and salary before the position can be filled.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall not approve any plan that does not first require the expenditure of the funds from the Youth Court Support Fund before expenditure of county funds is authorized for that purpose. (iv)  Title to any tangible property procured with funds authorized under this paragraph shall be and forever remain in the State of Mississippi. (c)  (i)  Each county court is eligible for youth court support funds.  The funds shall be utilized to provide compensation to an intake officer who shall be responsible for ensuring that all intake and case information for the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters, and the Department of Child Protection Services is entered into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) in an accurate and timely manner.  If the county court already has an intake officer or other staff person responsible for entering all cases of the Department of Human Services - Division of Youth Services, truancy matters and the Department of Child Protection Services into MYCIDS, the senior county court judge may certify that such a person is already on staff.  In such a case, the senior county court judge shall have discretion to direct the expenditure of those funds in hiring other support staff to carry on the business of the court. (ii)  For the purposes of this paragraph, "support staff" means court administrators, law clerks, legal research assistants, secretaries, resource administrators or case managers appointed by a youth court judge, or any combination thereof, but shall not mean school attendance officers. (iii)  The appointment of support staff shall be evidenced by the entry of an order on the minutes of the court.  The support staff so appointed shall serve at the will and pleasure of the senior county court judge but shall be an employee of the county. (iv)  The Administrative Office of Courts must approve the positions, job descriptions and salaries before the positions may be filled.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall not approve any plan that does not first require the expenditure of funds from the Youth Court Support Fund before expenditure of county funds is authorized for that purpose. (v)  The Administrative Office of Courts may approve expenditure from the fund for additional equipment for support staff appointed pursuant to this paragraph if the additional expenditure falls within the formula.  Title to any tangible property procured with funds authorized under this paragraph shall be and forever remain in the county to be used by the youth court and support staff. (2)  (a)  (i)  The formula developed by the Administrative Office of Courts for providing youth court support funds shall be devised so as to distribute appropriated funds proportional to caseload and other appropriate factors as set forth in regulations promulgated by the Administrative Office of Courts.  The formula will determine a reasonable maximum amount per judge or referee per annum that will not be exceeded in allocating funds under this section. (ii)  The formula shall be reviewed by the Administrative Office of Courts every two (2) years to ensure that the youth court support funds provided herein are proportional to each youth court's caseload and other specified factors. (iii)  The Administrative Office of Courts shall have wide latitude in the first two-year cycle to implement a formula designed to maximize caseload data collection. (b)  Application to receive funds under this section shall be submitted in accordance with procedures established by the Administrative Office of Courts. (c)  Approval of the use of any of the youth court support funds distributed under this section shall be made by the Administrative Office of Courts in accordance with procedures established by the Administrative Office of Courts. (3)  (a)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Youth Court Support Fund," which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be distributed to the youth courts by the Administrative Office of Courts for the purposes described in this section. (b)  (i)  During the regular legislative session held in calendar year 2007, the Legislature may appropriate an amount not to exceed Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) to the Youth Court Support Fund. (ii)  During each regular legislative session subsequent to the 2007 Regular Session, the Legislature shall appropriate Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) to the Youth Court Support Fund. (c)  No youth court judge or youth court referee shall be eligible to receive funding from the Youth Court Support Fund who has not received annual continuing education in the field of juvenile justice in an amount to conform with the requirements of the Rules and Regulations for Mandatory Continuing Judicial Education promulgated by the Supreme Court or received at least one (1) hour of annual continuing education concerning oversight of youth court intake officers and MYCIDS.  The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain records of all referees and youth court judges regarding such training and shall not disburse funds to any county or municipality for the budget of a youth court judge or referee who is not in compliance with the judicial training requirements. (4)  Any recipient of funds from the Youth Court Support Fund shall not be eligible for continuing disbursement of funds if the recipient is not in compliance with the terms, conditions and reporting requirements set forth in the procedures promulgated by the Administrative Office of Courts. (5)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2029. SECTION 4.  Section 45-33-61, Mississippi Code of 1972, is reenacted and amended as follows: 45-33-61.  (1)  A person convicted of a sex offense shall not access the Administrative Office of Courts' youth court data management system known as the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System or "MYCIDS." (2)  This section applies to all registered sex offenders without regard to the date of conviction for a registrable offense. (3)  The provisions of this section shall stand repealed on July 1, * * * 2026 2029. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.